Maryland, session 2026, HB0275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–909.
(b) (1) If an application for a Medicare supplement policy or certificate is
submitted during the 6–month period beginning with the first month in which an
individual who is at least 65 years old first enrolls for benefits under Medicare Part B, a
carrier:
(i) may not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of the
Medicare supplement policy or certificate or discriminate in the pricing of the Medicare
supplement policy or certificate because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of
health care, or medical condition of the applicant; or
(ii) may not deny, reduce, or condition coverage or apply an
increased premium rating to an applicant for a Medicare supplement policy because of the
health status, claims experience, or medical condition of the applicant or the use of medical
care by the applicant.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1)(ii) or [(6)(iii)2] (8)(III)2 of this
subsection, a carrier may include in a Medicare supplement policy a provision that complies
with subsection (d) of this section.
– 1 –

Ch. 139 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) A CARRIER THAT ISSUES MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICIES IN
THE STATE SHALL ISSUE ANY MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICY THE CARRIER SELLS
TO AN INDIVIDUAL ELIGIBLE FOR MEDICARE IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) WAS ENROLLED IN MEDICARE PART B WHILE ENROLLED IN
THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(II) WAS NOT DISENROLLED OR TERMINATED FROM THE
MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM UNTIL AT LEAST 6 MONTHS
FOLLOWING THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF ENROLLMENT IN MEDICARE PART B;
(III) APPLIES FOR THE MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICY DURING
THE 63–DAY PERIOD FOLLOWING THE LATER OF NOTICE OF TERMINATION OR
DISENROLLMENT OR THE DATE OF TERMINATION FROM THE MARYLAND MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM; AND
(IV) SUBMITS EVIDENCE OF THE DATE OF TERMINATION OR
DISENROLLMENT FROM THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM WITH
THE APPLICATION FOR A MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICY.
(4) A CARRIER THAT ISSUES MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICIES IN
THE STATE SHALL ISSUE ANY MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICY CURRENTLY OPEN
TO NEW ENROLLEES TO AN INDIVIDUAL ELIGIBLE FOR MEDICARE IF THE
INDIVIDUAL:
(I) BECAME ELIGIBLE FOR MEDICARE BEFORE JANUARY 1,
2020;
(II) QUALIFIES UNDER ANY FEDERAL SPECIAL ENROLLMENT
PERIOD GUARANTEED ISSUE RIGHT, INCLUDING FOR PLANS ISSUED ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2020;
(III) APPLIES FOR THE MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICY DURING
THE 63–DAY PERIOD FOLLOWING THE QUALIFYING EVENT FOR THE FEDERAL
SPECIAL ENROLLMENT PERIOD GUARANTEED ISSUE RIGHT; AND
(IV) SUBMITS EVIDENCE OF THE DATE OF THE QUALIFYING
EVENT FOR THE FEDERAL SPECIAL ENROLLMENT PERIOD GUARANTEED ISSUE
RIGHT WITH THE APPLICATION FOR A MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICY.
[(3)] (5) (i) A carrier shall make available Medicare supplement
policy plans A and D to an individual who is under the age of 65 years but is eligible for
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 139
Medicare due to a disability, if an application for a Medicare supplement policy or certificate
is submitted:
1. during the 6–month period following the applicant’s
enrollment in Part B of Medicare; or
2. if the applicant is notified by Medicare of the applicant’s
retroactive enrollment in Medicare, during the 6–month period following notification of
enrollment in Medicare.
(ii) For a Medicare supplement policy plan A or D required to be
made available under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a carrier:
1. may not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of
a Medicare supplement policy plan A or D because of the health status, claims experience,
receipt of health care, or medical condition of the applicant; or
2. may not deny, reduce, or condition coverage to the
applicant for a Medicare supplement policy plan A or D because of the health status, claims
experience, or medical condition of the applicant or the use of medical care by the applicant.
(iii) For a Medicare supplement policy plan A required to be made
available under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a carrier may not charge individuals
who are under the age of 65 years, but are eligible for Medicare due to a disability, a rate
higher than the average of the premiums paid by all policyholders age 65 and older in the
State who are covered under that plan A policy form.
[(4)] (6) A carrier may elect to offer Medicare supplement policy plans to
individuals who are under the age of 65 years, but eligible for Medicare due to a disability,
in addition to the Medicare supplement policy plans A and D that are required to be offered
under paragraph [(3)(i)] (5)(I) of this subsection.
[(5)] (7) [Nothing in paragraph (3)] PARAGRAPH (5) of this subsection
may NOT be construed to require a carrier to offer a Medicare supplement policy plan to
individuals who are under the age of 65 years, but are eligible for Medicare due to a
disability, if the plan is not offered to individuals who are eligible for Medicare due to age.
[(6)] (8) (i) This paragraph applies only on and after July 1, 2023.
(ii) During the 30 days following the birthday of an individual
enrolled in a Medicare supplement policy, a carrier shall make available to the individual
different Medicare supplement policies with benefits that are equal to or less than the
benefits of the individual’s existing coverage.
(iii) 1. For purposes of this paragraph, a Medicare supplement
policy has equal or lesser benefits unless:
– 3 –

Ch. 139 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. it contains one or more significant benefits not included in
the Medicare supplement policy being replaced; or
B. it contains the same significant benefits included in the
Medicare supplement policy being replaced but it reduces the cost–sharing responsibilities
of the enrollee for the benefits.
2. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing a
matrix for identifying which Medicare supplement policies have equal or lesser benefits.
(iv) For a Medicare supplement policy required to be made available
under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a carrier may not:
1. deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of a
Medicare supplement policy, or discriminate in the pricing of the policy, because of the
health status, claims experience, or medical condition of the individual or the receipt of
health care by the individual; or
2. deny, reduce, or condition coverage to the individual for a
Medicare supplement policy because of the health status, claims experience, or medical
condition of the individual or the use of medical care by the individual.
(v) A carrier that offers Medicare supplement policies shall notify an
insured of the insured’s rights under this paragraph at least 30 days, but not more than 60
days, before the insured’s birthday.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 4 –